Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 2 General State Officers

17-2-1.
General officers enumerated — Election and terms.

The governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general, and general treasurer shall be known as general officers. They shall be elected at a general election, quadrennially, in accordance with the provisions of this title, and shall hold their respective offices for four (4) years beginning on the first Tuesday of January next succeeding their election and until the election and qualification of their respective successors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 826, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 1912, ch. 817, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 13, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 320, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-1-1

; G.L. 1956, §

17-2-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 25.

17-2-2.
Death or incapacity of governor elect.

When the governor elect dies, removes from the state, refuses to serve, becomes insane, or is otherwise incapacitated, the lieutenant governor elect shall be qualified as governor at the beginning of the term for which he or she was elected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 826, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 14, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 13, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 320, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

17-1-3

; G.L. 1956, §

17-2-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-2-3.
Elections by general assembly on failure to elect or incapacity of person elected.

When both the governor and lieutenant governor elect, or one among the lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general, or general treasurer elect, are incapacitated, or when there has been a failure to elect one or more of the officers mentioned in this section, the general assembly shall, upon its organization, meet in grand committee and elect some person or persons to fill the office or offices, as the case may be, for which the incapacity exists or as to which the failure to elect occurred. When the general assembly elects any of the officers because of the failure of any person to receive a plurality of the votes cast, the election in each case shall be made from the persons who received the same and largest number of votes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 826, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 14, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 13, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 320, § 3; G.L. 1956, § 17-1-4; G.L. 1956, §

17-2-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-2-4.
Filling vacancies in offices of governor and lieutenant governor.

If the offices of governor and lieutenant governor are both vacant by reason of death or otherwise, they shall be filled by the general assembly in grand committee, and the acting governor shall, if the general assembly is not then in session, call a special session of the general assembly for that purpose within twenty (20) days after both of the offices become vacant, if a stated session is not sooner to occur.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 826, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 14, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 13, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 320, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

17-1-5

; G.L. 1956, §

17-2-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-2-5.
Vacancies in other general offices.

In case of a vacancy in the office of secretary of state, attorney general, or general treasurer, from any cause, the general assembly in grand committee shall elect some person to fill the office; provided, that if the vacancy occurs when the general assembly is not in session, the governor shall appoint some person to fill the vacancy until a successor elected by the general assembly is qualified to act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 826, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 14, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 13, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 320, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

17-1-6

; G.L. 1956, §

17-2-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-2-6.
Majority required in general assembly — Term of officer elected to fill vacancy.

In elections by the general assembly in grand committee, the person receiving a majority of the votes shall be elected. Every person elected by the general assembly to fill a vacancy, pursuant to the provision of this chapter, shall hold his or her office for the remainder of the term or for the full term, as the case may be, and until his or her successor is elected and qualified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 826, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 14, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 13, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 320, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

17-1-7

; G.L. 1956, §

17-2-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.